Utah statutes.
26-15a-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Back country food service establishment" means a federal or state licensed back country guiding or outfitting business that:

(a)  provides food services; and

(b)  meets department recognized federal or state food service safety regulations for food handlers.

(2)  "Certified food safety manager" means a manager of a food service establishment who:

(a)  passes successfully a department-approved examination;

(b)  successfully completes, every three years, renewal requirements established by department rule consistent with original certification requirements; and

(c)  submits to the appropriate local health department the documentation required by Section 26-15a-106.

(3)  "Food service establishment" means any place or area within a business or organization where potentially hazardous foods are prepared and intended for individual portion service and consumption by the general public, whether the consumption is on or off the premises, and whether or not a fee is charged for the food.

(4)  "Local health department" means a local health department as defined in Subsection 26A-1-102(5).

(5)  "Potentially hazardous foods" shall be defined by the department by administrative rule adopted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

